Tennessee, session 114, SB2547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-111(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting:
If the board incurs a vacancy, it shall notify the appointing authority in writing
within forty-five (45) days after the vacancy occurs.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2547
012281
- 1 -